tex/context/patterns/lang-sr.hyp
% generated by mtxrun --script pattern --convert

% for comment and copyright, see e:/tmp/patterns/lang-sr.rme

% used: а б в г д е з и к л м н о п р с т у ц ш ј њ ћ

\hyphenation{
на-дно
на-тка
на-тка-ти
на-тка-ше
о-дно
о-тка
о-тка-ти
о-тка-ше
по-дно
по-дне
по-тку
по-тки
по-тке
по-тка
у-дно
и-где
и-гдје
сву-где
све-где
сву-гдје
све-гдје
по-не-где
по-не-гдје
и-зби
и-збе
и-зба
и-зби-ци
и-зби-це
и-зби-ца
и-звит
и-зим
изо-ба-ру
изо-ба-ри
изо-ба-ре
изо-ба-ра
и-скок
и-ско-ку
и-ско-ка
и-скон
и-ско-ну
и-ско-ни
и-ско-на
и-скру
и-скре
и-скри
и-скра
и-скрав
и-спод
и-спо-да
и-стру
и-стри
и-стро
и-стре
и-стра
на-ју
на-ји
на-јо
на-је
на-ја
на-јам
на-јест
о-браз
о-брет
о-дви-ка
о-дран
о-дра-ти
пре-двој
ра-зму
ра-зми
ра-змо
ра-зме
ра-зма
ра-зну
ра-зни
ра-зно
ра-зне
ра-зна
ра-склоп
ра-спе-лу
ра-спе-ло
ра-спе-ла
ра-спе-ћа
ра-спе-ћу
ра-спе-ће
ра-сту
ра-сти
ра-сте
ра-ста
ра-стом
ра-стер
ра-шћу
ра-шћи
ра-шћо
ра-шће
ра-шћа
у-зно
у-зна
у-зни
у-зник
у-зрок
у-ску
у-ски
у-ско
у-ске
у-ска
ус-кос
у-спио
у-спео
у-спор
у-шћу
у-шће
у-шћа
ин-те-рес
тран-су
тран-са
тран-сом
те-ле-ви-зор
те-ле-ви-зо-ру
те-ле-ви-зо-ром
те-ле-ви-зо-ра
те-ле-ви-зо-ри
при-ти-сак
при-ти-с-ком
при-ти-с-ку
при-ти-с-ка
по-ја-ви-ће
на-пу-шта
про-гра-ми-ра-ње
сни-ма-ња
сни-ма-ње}
